Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-4] Contents of safe deposit box or
other safekeeping depository. Tangible property held in a safe deposit box
or other safekeeping depository in this State in the ordinary course of the
holder's business and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property
permitted by other law, shall be presumed abandoned if the property remains
unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after expiration of the lease
or rental period on the box or other depository. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next